Utah statutes.
75-3-712.   Sale, encumbrance or transaction involving conflict of interest
-- Voidable -- Exceptions.
Any sale or encumbrance to the personal representative, his spouse, agent, or
attorney, or any corporation or trust in which he has a substantial beneficial
interest, or any transaction which is affected by a substantial conflict of
interest on the part of the personal representative, is voidable by any person
interested in the estate, except one who has consented after fair disclosure,
unless:
(1)  The will or a contract entered into by the decedent expressly authorized
the transaction; or
(2)  The transaction is approved by the court after notice to interested
persons.
